en: Dark chocolate drops
fr: Pépites de chocolat noir

en: Sugary cooking helpers
de: Süße Kochhelfer, Backhilfen, Kochhilfen für Süßspeisen
fr: Aide culinaire sucrée
hr: Slatki kuharski pomoćnici
nl: Zoete kookhulpmiddelen

en: Fondants
fr: Pâtes à sucre, Fondants, glaçages au sucre
hr: Fondanti
ja: フォンダン
nl: Fondants

en: Xanthan gum
hr: Ksantan guma
ja: キサンタンガム
nl: Xanthaangom

en: Bread coverings
nl: Broodbeleggen, Broodbeleg
zh: 面包罩

en: Food decorations
es: Decoraciones alimentarias
fi: ruuan koristeet
fr: Décorations alimentaires
hr: Ukrasi za hranu
it: Decorazioni alimentari
nl: Levensmiddeldecoraties, Levensmiddeldecoratie
zh: 食品装饰品

en: Sprinkles
bg: Фиде
fr: Vermicelles
hr: vermiceli
ja: スプリンクル
nl: Hagelslag

en: Multi-coloured vermicelli, Rainbow sprinkles
de: Backdekorationen
fr: Vermicelles multicolores
hr: Raznobojni vermicelli
nl: Meerkleurenhagelsag

en: Sugar sprinkles
fr: Vermicelles en sucre
hr: Šećerne posipe
nl: Suikerhagelslag

en: Chocolate sprinkles
de: Schokoladenstreusel
fr: Vermicelles en chocolat
hr: Čokoladni posipi
nl: Chocoladehagelslag, Chocolade hagel

en: Dark chocolate sprinkles, Dark choclate sprinkles
nl: Chocoladehagelslag puur, Chocolade hagel puur

en: Milk chocolate sprinkles, Milk choclate sprinkles
nl: Chocoladehagelslag melk, Hagelchocolade hagel melk

en: Halloween foods and drinks
de: Halloweenspeisen und -getränke
es: Bebidas y alimentos de Halloween
fi: Halloween-ruoat ja juomat
fr: Aliments et boissons d'Halloween
hr: Hrana i piće za noć vještica
it: Alimenti e bevande per Halloween
nl: Halloween-levensmiddelen, Halloween-levensmiddel

en: St. Patrick's Day foods and drinks
da: Skt. Patricks dag mad- og drikkevarer
sv: Sankt Patriks dag mat och dryckor

en: Cheese soufflés, Cheese soufflé
fr: Soufflés au fromage, Soufflé au fromage

en: Friands
fr: Friands
hr: Prijatelji
nl: Friand

en: Large sausage rolls, Sausage friands, Puff pastries with sausage, puff pastry with sausage
fr: Friands à la saucisse
hr: Prijatelji kobasica
nl: Worst friands

en: Meat in puff pastry
fr: Feuilleté à la viande, Friand à la viande

en: Cheese in puff pastry, Puff pastry cheese pocket
fr: Feuilleté au fromage, Friand au fromage

en: Seafood in puff pastry
fr: Feuilletés aux fruits de mer